Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
Article 3 Transportation

27-3-90.
Requirements for lawful transportation.

It shall be unlawful for any person to remove, ship, or transport from any point within this state to another point within this state or from any point within this state to any point beyond the borders of this state, except as otherwise provided, any wildlife taken in this state unless the wildlife is in the personal possession of or is carried openly by the person who took such wildlife and unless the person has in his possession a proper license or permit as prescribed by the wildlife laws, rules, and regulations.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, § 13; Ga. L. 1916, p. 114, § 3; Code 1933, § 45-305; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 45; Code 1933, § 45-401, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-3-91.
Transportation by carrier within state.

It shall be unlawful for any person to take any wildlife and have such wildlife transported to his home or any other place within this state by a carrier unless the person files with the carrier a written statement giving his name and address and the number of wildlife to be so transported and specifying that he lawfully took the wildlife and that it is to be disposed of lawfully. A copy of the statement shall be attached to the wildlife or to its packaging.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 46; Code 1933, § 45-402, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

Cross references.

Carriers generally, §

46-9-1

et seq.

27-3-92.
Transportation out of state.

It shall be unlawful for any person, other than a carrier who has complied with Code Section 27-3-94, to remove, ship, or transport wildlife out of this state except under the following conditions:

The person must have in his possession at the time of such removing, shipping, or transporting the proper wildlife license or permit duly issued to such person by the department;

The person cannot remove from the state more than the bag or possession limits established by law or regulation;

The person shall make a sworn statement, duly attested to by an authorized officer of this state, which statement shall show that the person has lawfully taken such wildlife and that they are not for sale, except as otherwise permitted by the wildlife laws, rules, and regulations, and shall show the number of wildlife being shipped, transported, or removed from the state. One copy of the statement shall be given the carrier, if such wildlife is being transported by carrier, and one shall be attached to the wildlife being shipped, transported, or removed from the state; and

The person shall submit his license or permit and sworn statement to any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or game warden for inspection when requested to do so.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 47; Code 1933, § 45-403, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” in paragraph (4).

27-3-93.
Transportation for propagation and scientific purposes.

It shall be unlawful for any person to ship or transport from any point within this state to any other point within this state, or to points beyond this state, any wildlife or parts thereof for propagation or scientific purposes unless the person has been issued and is holding a valid scientific collecting permit. Both the person shipping or transporting the wildlife and any carrier accepting such shipment shall, on the same day the shipment is made, report to the department the number and the species of wildlife shipped, to whom shipped, and by whom shipped.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 48; Code 1933, § 45-404, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-3-94.
Acceptance by carriers of wildlife for shipment; reports required.

It shall be unlawful for any carrier to ship, transport, or receive for shipment or transportation any wildlife, except as otherwise provided by the wildlife laws, rules, or regulations, without having ascertained that the person offering the wildlife for shipment or transportation was then and there in possession of a proper license or permit duly issued for the period when the shipment was offered, or without receiving from the person a sworn statement as provided in paragraph (3) of Code Section 27-3-92. Any carrier who shall ship or transport the skins, hides, or pelts of fur-bearing animals shall be required to make reports of such shipments or transportation as may be required by the rules and regulations of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, § 19; Ga. L. 1916, p. 114, § 8; Code 1933, § 45-306; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 49; Code 1933, § 45-405, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.